Illinois, session 104th, SB3195.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 11-208.9 and 11-1414 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-208.9)7    Sec. 11-208.9. Automated traffic law enforcement system; 8approaching, overtaking, and passing a school bus.9    (a) As used in this Section, "automated traffic law 10enforcement system" means a device with one or more motor 11vehicle sensors working in conjunction with the visual signals 12on a school bus, as specified in Sections 12-803 and 12-805 of 13this Code, to produce recorded images of motor vehicles that 14fail to stop before meeting or overtaking, from either 15direction, any school bus stopped at any location for the 16purpose of receiving or discharging pupils in violation of 17Section 11-1414 of this Code or a similar provision of a local 18ordinance.19    An automated traffic law enforcement system is a system, 20in a municipality or county operated by a governmental agency, 21that produces a recorded image of a motor vehicle's violation 22of a provision of this Code or a local ordinance and is 23designed to obtain a clear recorded image of the vehicle and   SB3195- 2 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1the vehicle's license plate. The recorded image must also 2display the time, date, and location of the violation.3    (b) As used in this Section, "recorded images" means 4images recorded by an automated traffic law enforcement system 5on:6        (1) 2 or more photographs;7        (2) 2 or more microphotographs;8        (3) 2 or more electronic images; or9        (4) a video recording showing the motor vehicle and, 10    on at least one image or portion of the recording, clearly 11    identifying the registration plate or digital registration 12    plate number of the motor vehicle.13    (c) A municipality or county that produces a recorded 14image of a motor vehicle's violation of a provision of this 15Code or a local ordinance must make the recorded images of a 16violation accessible to the alleged violator by providing the 17alleged violator with a website address, accessible through 18the Internet.19    (d) For each violation of a provision of this Code or a 20local ordinance recorded by an automated traffic law 21enforcement system, the county or municipality having 22jurisdiction shall issue a written notice of the violation to 23the registered owner of the vehicle, who shall be liable for 24the violation unless otherwise provided in this Section as the 25alleged violator. The notice shall be delivered to the 26registered owner of the vehicle, by mail, within 30 days after   SB3195- 3 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1the Secretary of State notifies the municipality or county 2confirms of the identity of the owner of the vehicle, but in no 3event later than 90 days after the violation.4    (e) The notice required under subsection (d) shall 5include:6        (1) the name and address of the registered owner of 7    the vehicle;8        (2) the registration number of the motor vehicle 9    involved in the violation;10        (3) the violation charged;11        (4) the location where the violation occurred;12        (5) the date and time of the violation;13        (6) a copy of the recorded images;14        (7) the amount of the civil penalty imposed and the 15    date by which the civil penalty should be paid; 16        (8) a statement that recorded images are evidence of a 17    violation of overtaking or passing a school bus stopped 18    for the purpose of receiving or discharging pupils;19        (9) a warning that failure to pay the civil penalty or 20    to contest liability in a timely manner is an admission of 21    liability;22        (10) a statement that the person may elect to proceed 23    by:24            (A) paying the fine; or25            (B) challenging the charge in court, by mail, or 26        by administrative hearing; and  SB3195- 4 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1        (11) a website address, accessible through the 2    Internet, where the person may view the recorded images of 3    the violation.4    (e-5) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a 5school bus was stopped for the purpose of receiving or 6discharging pupils and that the visual signals as specified in 7Sections 12-803 and 12-805 were in operation on the school bus 8when recorded images produced by an automated traffic law 9enforcement system show:10        (1) an activated stop signal arm; and11        (2) an electronic indicator indicating activation of 12    school bus visual signals. 13    (f) (Blank).14    (g) Based on inspection of recorded images produced by an 15automated traffic law enforcement system, a notice alleging 16that the violation occurred shall be evidence of the facts 17contained in the notice and admissible in any proceeding 18alleging a violation under this Section.19    (h) Recorded images made by an automated traffic law 20enforcement system are confidential and shall be made 21available only to the alleged violator and governmental and 22law enforcement agencies for purposes of adjudicating a 23violation of this Section, for statistical purposes, or for 24other governmental purposes. Any recorded image evidencing a 25violation of this Section, however, may be admissible in any 26proceeding resulting from the issuance of the citation.  SB3195- 5 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1    (i) The court or hearing officer may consider in defense 2of a violation: 3        (1) that the motor vehicle or registration plates or 4    digital registration plates of the motor vehicle were 5    stolen before the violation occurred and not under the 6    control of or in the possession of the owner or lessee at 7    the time of the violation;8        (1.5) that the motor vehicle was hijacked before the 9    violation occurred and not under the control of or in the 10    possession of the owner or lessee at the time of the 11    violation;12        (2) that the driver of the motor vehicle received a 13    Uniform Traffic Citation from a police officer for a 14    violation of Section 11-1414 of this Code within 15    one-eighth of a mile and 15 minutes of the violation that 16    was recorded by the system; 17        (3) that the visual signals required by Sections 18    12-803 and 12-805 of this Code were damaged, not 19    activated, not present in violation of Sections 12-803 and 20    12-805, or inoperable; and21        (4) any other evidence or issues provided by municipal 22    or county ordinance.23    (j) To demonstrate that the motor vehicle was hijacked or 24the motor vehicle or registration plates or digital 25registration plates were stolen before the violation occurred 26and were not under the control or possession of the owner or   SB3195- 6 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1lessee at the time of the violation, the owner or lessee must 2submit proof that a report concerning the motor vehicle or 3registration plates was filed with a law enforcement agency in 4a timely manner.5    (k) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a 6Uniform Traffic Citation from a police officer at the time of 7the violation, the motor vehicle owner is subject to a 8mandatory civil penalty of $300 not exceeding $150 for a first 9time violation or $1,000 $500 for a second or subsequent 10violation, plus an additional penalty of not more than $100 11for failure to pay the original penalty in a timely manner, if 12the motor vehicle is recorded by an automated traffic law 13enforcement system. A violation for which a civil penalty is 14imposed under this Section is not a violation of a traffic 15regulation governing the movement of vehicles and may not be 16recorded on the driving record of the owner of the vehicle, but 17may be recorded by the municipality or county for the purpose 18of determining if a person is subject to the higher fine for a 19second or subsequent offense.20    (l) A school bus equipped with an automated traffic law 21enforcement system must be posted with a sign indicating that 22the school bus is being monitored by an automated traffic law 23enforcement system.24    (m) A municipality or county that has one or more school 25buses equipped with an automated traffic law enforcement 26system must provide notice to drivers by posting a list of   SB3195- 7 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1school districts using school buses equipped with an automated 2traffic law enforcement system on the municipality or county 3website. School districts that have one or more school buses 4equipped with an automated traffic law enforcement system must 5provide notice to drivers by posting that information on their 6websites.7    (n) A municipality or county operating an automated 8traffic law enforcement system shall conduct a statistical 9analysis to assess the safety impact in each school district 10using school buses equipped with an automated traffic law 11enforcement system following installation of the system and 12every 2 years thereafter. A municipality or county operating 13an automated speed enforcement system before the effective 14date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly 15shall conduct a statistical analysis to assess the safety 16impact of the system by no later than one year after the 17effective date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 18Assembly and every 2 years thereafter. Each statistical 19analysis shall be based upon the best available crash, 20traffic, and other data, and shall cover a period of time 21before and after installation of the system sufficient to 22provide a statistically valid comparison of safety impact. 23Each statistical analysis shall be consistent with 24professional judgment and acceptable industry practice. Each 25statistical analysis also shall be consistent with the data 26required for valid comparisons of before and after conditions   SB3195- 8 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1and shall be conducted within a reasonable period following 2the installation of the automated traffic law enforcement 3system. Each statistical analysis required by this subsection 4shall be made available to the public and shall be published on 5the website of the municipality or county. If a statistical 6analysis indicates that there has been an increase in the rate 7of crashes at the approach to school buses monitored by the 8system, the municipality or county shall undertake additional 9studies to determine the cause and severity of the crashes, 10and may take any action that it determines is necessary or 11appropriate to reduce the number or severity of the crashes 12involving school buses equipped with an automated traffic law 13enforcement system.14    (o) The compensation paid for an automated traffic law 15enforcement system must be based on the value of the equipment 16or the services provided and such compensation may not be 17based exclusively on the number of traffic citations issued or 18the revenue generated by the system.19    (o-1) No member of the General Assembly and no officer or 20employee of a municipality or county shall knowingly accept 21employment or receive compensation or fees for services from a 22vendor that provides automated traffic law enforcement system 23equipment or services to municipalities or counties. No former 24member of the General Assembly shall, within a period of 2 25years immediately after the termination of service as a member 26of the General Assembly, knowingly accept employment or   SB3195- 9 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1receive compensation or fees for services from a vendor that 2provides automated traffic law enforcement system equipment or 3services to municipalities or counties. No former officer or 4employee of a municipality or county shall, within a period of 52 years immediately after the termination of municipal or 6county employment, knowingly accept employment or receive 7compensation or fees for services from a vendor that provides 8automated traffic law enforcement system equipment or services 9to municipalities or counties. 10    (p) No person who is the lessor of a motor vehicle pursuant 11to a written lease agreement shall be liable for an automated 12speed or traffic law enforcement system violation involving 13such motor vehicle during the period of the lease; provided 14that upon the request of the appropriate authority received 15within 120 days after the violation occurred, the lessor 16provides within 60 days after such receipt the name and 17address of the lessee. 18    Upon the provision of information by the lessor pursuant 19to this subsection, the county or municipality may issue the 20violation to the lessee of the vehicle in the same manner as it 21would issue a violation to a registered owner of a vehicle 22pursuant to this Section, and the lessee may be held liable for 23the violation. 24    (q) (Blank).25    (r) After a municipality or county enacts an ordinance 26providing for automated traffic law enforcement systems under   SB3195- 10 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1this Section, each school district within that municipality or 2county's jurisdiction may implement an automated traffic law 3enforcement system under this Section. The elected school 4board for that district must approve the implementation of an 5automated traffic law enforcement system. The school district 6shall be responsible for entering into a contract, approved by 7the elected school board of that district, with vendors for 8the installation, maintenance, and operation of the automated 9traffic law enforcement system. The school district must enter 10into an intergovernmental agreement, approved by the elected 11school board of that district, with the municipality or county 12with jurisdiction over that school district for the 13administration of the automated traffic law enforcement 14system. The proceeds from a school district's automated 15traffic law enforcement system's fines shall be divided 16equally between the school district and the municipality or 17county administering the automated traffic law enforcement 18system. However, the school district and municipality or 19county intergovernmental agreement may include cost-sharing 20arrangements for compensating vendors for the installation, 21maintenance, and operation of the automated traffic law 22enforcement system, as well as alternative proceed-sharing 23arrangements.24    (s) If a county or municipality changes the vendor it uses 25for its automated traffic law enforcement system and must, as 26a consequence, apply for a permit, approval, or other   SB3195- 11 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1authorization from the Department for reinstallation of one or 2more malfunctioning components of that system and if, at the 3time of the application, the new vendor operates an automated 4traffic law enforcement system for any other county or 5municipality in the State, then the Department shall approve 6or deny the county or municipality's application for that 7permit, approval, or other authorization within 90 days after 8its receipt. 9    (t) The Department may revoke any permit, approval, or 10other authorization granted to a county or municipality for 11the placement, installation, or operation of an automated 12traffic law enforcement system if any official or employee who 13serves that county or municipality is charged with bribery, 14official misconduct, or a similar crime related to the 15placement, installation, or operation of the automated traffic 16law enforcement system in the county or municipality.17    The Department shall adopt any rules necessary to 18implement and administer this subsection. The rules adopted by 19the Department shall describe the revocation process, shall 20ensure that notice of the revocation is provided, and shall 21provide an opportunity to appeal the revocation. Any county or 22municipality that has a permit, approval, or other 23authorization revoked under this subsection may not reapply 24for such a permit, approval, or other authorization for a 25period of 1 year after the revocation. 26(Source: P.A. 102-905, eff. 1-1-23; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23;   SB3195- 12 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-364, eff. 7-28-23.) 2    (625 ILCS 5/11-1414)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-1414)3    Sec. 11-1414. Approaching, overtaking, and passing school 4bus. 5    (a) The driver of a vehicle shall stop such vehicle before 6meeting or overtaking, from either direction, any school bus 7stopped on a highway, roadway, private road, parking lot, 8school property, or at any other location, including, without 9limitation, a location that is not a highway or roadway for the 10purpose of receiving or discharging pupils. Such stop is 11required before reaching the school bus when there is in 12operation on the school bus the visual signals as specified in 13Sections 12-803 and 12-805 of this Code. The driver of the 14vehicle shall not proceed until the school bus resumes motion 15or the driver of the vehicle is signaled by the school bus 16driver to proceed or the visual signals are no longer 17actuated. 18    (b) The stop signal arm required by Section 12-803 of this 19Code shall be extended after the school bus has come to a 20complete stop for the purpose of loading or discharging pupils 21and shall be closed before the school bus is placed in motion 22again. The stop signal arm shall not be extended at any other 23time.24    (c) The alternately flashing red signal lamps of an 8-lamp 25flashing signal system required by Section 12-805 of this Code   SB3195- 13 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1shall be actuated after the school bus has come to a complete 2stop for the purpose of loading or discharging pupils and 3shall be turned off before the school bus is placed in motion 4again. The red signal lamps shall not be actuated at any other 5time except as provided in paragraph (d) of this Section.6    (d) The alternately flashing amber signal lamps of an 78-lamp flashing signal system required by Section 12-805 of 8this Code shall be actuated continuously during not less than 9the last 100 feet traveled by the school bus before stopping 10for the purpose of loading or discharging pupils within an 11urban area and during not less than the last 200 feet traveled 12by the school bus outside an urban area. The amber signal lamps 13shall remain actuated until the school bus is stopped. The 14amber signal lamps shall not be actuated at any other time.15    (d-5) The alternately flashing head lamps permitted by 16Section 12-805 of this Code may be operated while the 17alternately flashing red or amber signal lamps required by 18that Section are actuated.19    (e) The driver of a vehicle upon a highway divided by a 20raised median or physical barrier having 4 or more lanes which 21permits at least 2 lanes of traffic to travel in opposite 22directions need not stop such vehicle upon meeting a school 23bus which is stopped in the opposing roadway across the 24divided highway; and need not stop such vehicle when driving 25upon a controlled access highway when passing a school bus 26traveling in either direction that is stopped in a loading   SB3195- 14 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1zone adjacent to the surfaced or improved part of the 2controlled access highway where pedestrians are not permitted 3to cross.4    (f) Beginning with the effective date of this amendatory 5Act of 1985, the Secretary of State shall suspend for a period 6of 3 months the driving privileges of any person convicted of a 7violation of subsection (a) of this Section or a similar 8provision of a local ordinance; the Secretary shall suspend 9for a period of one year the driving privileges of any person 10convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subsection 11(a) of this Section or a similar provision of a local ordinance 12if the second or subsequent violation occurs within 5 years of 13a prior conviction for the same offense. In addition to the 14suspensions authorized by this Section, any person convicted 15of violating this Section or a similar provision of a local 16ordinance shall be subject to a mandatory fine of $300 or, upon 17a second or subsequent violation, $1,000, and community 18service in an amount set by the court. The Secretary may also 19grant, for the duration of any suspension issued under this 20subsection, a restricted driving permit granting the privilege 21of driving a motor vehicle between the driver's residence and 22place of employment or within other proper limits that the 23Secretary of State shall find necessary to avoid any undue 24hardship. A restricted driving permit issued hereunder shall 25be subject to cancellation, revocation and suspension by the 26Secretary of State in like manner and for like cause as a   SB3195- 15 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1driver's license may be cancelled, revoked or suspended; 2except that a conviction upon one or more offenses against 3laws or ordinances regulating the movement of traffic shall be 4deemed sufficient cause for the revocation, suspension or 5cancellation of the restricted driving permit. The Secretary 6of State may, as a condition to the issuance of a restricted 7driving permit, require the applicant to participate in a 8designated driver remedial or rehabilitative program. Any 9conviction for a violation of this subsection shall be 10included as an offense for the purposes of determining 11suspension action under any other provision of this Code, 12provided however, that the penalties provided under this 13subsection shall be imposed unless those penalties imposed 14under other applicable provisions are greater.15    The owner of any vehicle alleged to have violated 16paragraph (a) of this Section shall, upon appropriate demand 17by the State's Attorney or other designated person acting in 18response to a signed complaint, provide a written statement or 19deposition identifying the operator of the vehicle if such 20operator was not the owner at the time of the alleged 21violation. Failure to supply such information shall result in 22the suspension of the vehicle registration of the vehicle for 23a period of 3 months. In the event the owner has assigned 24control for the use of the vehicle to another, the person to 25whom control was assigned shall comply with the provisions of 26this paragraph and be subject to the same penalties as herein   SB3195- 16 -LRB104 19763 LNS 33213 b1provided.2(Source: P.A. 101-55, eff. 1-1-20; 102-859, eff. 1-1-23.)